Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.016

Mediation in cases involving domestic violence or child abuse.

Mediation is generally inappropriate in cases involving domestic violence and child abuse. In order to effectively identify cases where issues of domestic violence and child abuse are present and reduce conflict in dissolution matters: (1) Where appropriate parties shall be provided access to trained domestic violence advocates; and (2) in cases where a victim requests mediation the court may make exceptions and permit mediation, so long as the court makes a finding that mediation is appropriate under the circumstances and the victim is permitted to have a supporting person present during the mediation proceedings.

[ 2007 c 496 s 301.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2007 c 496: See note following RCW 26.09.002.